Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.905

Construction—2008 c 262.

Nothing in this act may be construed as giving the *department of information services or any other entities any additional authority, regulatory or otherwise, over providers of telecommunications and information technology.

[ 2008 c 262 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "department of information services" was renamed the "consolidated technology services agency" by 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 803. Subsequently, the "consolidated technology services agency" was renamed "Washington technology solutions" by 2024 c 54 s 4.

Findings—Intent—2008 c 262: "(1) The legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) The deployment and adoption of high-speed internet services and information technology has resulted in enhanced economic development and public safety for the state's communities, improved health care and educational opportunities, and a better quality of life for the state's residents;

(b) Continued progress in the deployment and adoption of high-speed internet services and other advanced telecommunications services, both land-based and wireless, is vital to ensuring Washington remains competitive and continues to create business and job growth; and

(c) That the state must encourage and support strategic partnerships of public, private, nonprofit, and community-based sectors in the continued growth and development of high-speed internet services and information technology for state residents and businesses.

(2) Therefore, in order to begin advancing the state towards further growth and development of high-speed internet in the state, and to ensure a better quality of life for all state residents, it is the legislature's intent to conduct a statewide needs assessment of broadband internet resources through an open dialogue with all interested parties, including providers, unions, businesses, community organizations, local governments, and state agencies. The legislature intends to use this needs assessment in guiding future plans on how to ensure that every resident in Washington state may gain access to high-speed internet services and, as part of this effort, to address digital literacy and technology training needs of low-income and technology underserved residents of the state through state support of community technology programs." [ 2008 c 262 s 1.]